Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.100

Scientific school grant to Washington State University.

The one hundred thousand acres of land granted by the United States government to the state for a scientific school in section 17 of the enabling act, are assigned to the support of Washington State University.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.100. Prior: 1917 c 11 s 1; RRS s 5525.]